Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.160 RCW to read as follows:(1) The state director of fire protection or their authorized representative must investigate alleged violations of this chapter.(2) Upon the request of a fire code official, a fire protection sprinkler system contractor performing work on a fire protection sprinkler system must produce evidence of a license issued by the director of fire protection under this chapter. Failure to produce such evidence is an infraction under this chapter.(3) If the fire protection sprinkler system contractor working on a fire protection sprinkler system does not have a license or is otherwise acting in violation of this chapter, the fire code official may issue a stop work order on the project. The order remains in effect until the fire code official or state director of fire protection finds that the contractor is in compliance with this chapter or otherwise finds that the work will be conducted in compliance with this chapter.(4) A fire code official may determine whether public safety warrants the removal and replacement of a fire protection sprinkler system or any component thereto that has been installed, altered, or extended by an unlicensed fire protection sprinkler system contractor.(5) If a fire code official finds that a fire protection sprinkler system contractor working on a fire protection sprinkler system does not have a license or is in violation of other provisions of this chapter, the fire official shall promptly notify the state director of fire protection or their designee to initiate an investigation.(6) For purposes of this section, "fire code official" means any person authorized by a city, town, county, or local governing body with jurisdiction over fire industry regulation or any other person authorized by the state director of fire protection to conduct enforcement under this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.160 RCW to read as follows:The state director of fire protection or the director's designee, may require a fire protection sprinkler system contractor to provide all relevant payroll recordsÂ in a timely mannerÂ pertaining to an active investigation under this chapter.Sec. 3. RCW 18.270.070 and 2023 c 329 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) An authorized representative of the director must investigate alleged violations of this chapter.(2) Upon the request of ((an authorized representative))a fire code official, a person performing fire protection sprinkler fitting or residential sprinkler fitting work must produce evidence of a certificate issued by the director in accordance with this chapter. Failure to produce such evidence is an infraction as provided by RCW 18.270.020.(3) If a person performing fire protection sprinkler fitting work does not have a certificate or if a person or contractor is otherwise acting in violation of this chapter, the fire code official may issue a stop work order on the project. The order remains in effect until the fire code official or director finds that the person or contractor is in compliance or otherwise finds that the work will be conducted in compliance with this chapter.(4) A fire code official may determine whether public safety warrants the removal and replacement of a fire protection sprinkler system or any component thereto that has been installed, altered, or extended by an uncertified person.(5) If a fire code official finds that a person working on a fire protection sprinkler system does not have a certificate or finds that a person or contractor is otherwise violating the requirements in this chapter, the fire official shall promptly notify the director or the director's designee to initiate an investigation.(6) For purposes of this section, "fire code official" means any person authorized by a city, town, county, or local governing body with jurisdiction over fire industry regulation or any other person authorized by the state director of fire protection to conduct enforcement under this chapter.--- END ---